Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-908
Interfering with a fireman on official duty; penalty; fireman, defined.

(1) A person commits the offense of interfering with a fireman if at any time and place where any fireman is discharging or attempting to discharge any official duties, he willfully:

(a) Resists or interferes with the lawful efforts of any fireman in the discharge or attempt to discharge an official duty; or

(b) Disobeys the lawful orders given by any fireman while performing his duties; or

(c) Engages in any disorderly conduct which delays or prevents a fire from being extinguished within a reasonable time; or

(d) Forbids or prevents others from assisting or extinguishing a fire or exhorts another person, as to whom he has no legal right or obligation to protect or control, not to assist in extinguishing a fire.

(2) As used in this section, fireman shall mean any person who is an officer, employee, or member of a fire department or fire-protection or firefighting agency of the federal government, the State of Nebraska, a city, county, city and county, district, or other public or municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state, whether such person is a volunteer or partly paid or fully paid, while he is actually engaged in firefighting, fire supervision, fire suppression, fire prevention, or fire investigation.

(3) Interference with a fireman on official duty is a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 193.